Alaska, session 34, HB246.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 14.30.650 is amended to read: 05 Sec. 14.30.650. Funding. Each fiscal year, the department shall allocate to the 06 agency not less than $26.89 [$23.13] times the number of students in the state in 07 average daily membership in the preceding fiscal year as determined under 08 AS 14.17.600. Money to carry out the provisions of this section may be appropriated 09 annually by the legislature. If amounts are insufficient to meet the allocation 10 authorized under this section for a fiscal year, the allocation shall be reduced pro rata. 11 * Sec. 2. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 12 read: 13 RETROACTIVITY. This Act is retroactive to July 1, 2026. 14 * Sec. 3. This Act takes effect July 1, 2026. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.